Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 807.370 is amended to read:
807.370. (1) Fees for issuance of or application for a driving privilege are as follows:
(a) Class C driver license or restricted Class C driver license, [ $54] $58.
(b) Class C limited term driver license or restricted Class C limited term driver license, $23.
(c) Commercial driver license, whether or not the driver license contains  endorsements, [ $75]
$160.
(d) Limited term commercial driver license, whether or not the driver license contains  endorse-
ments, $45.
(e) Instruction driver permit, [ $23] $30.
(f) Commercial learner driver permit, [ $23] $40.
(g) Limited term commercial learner driver permit, $23.
(h) Special student driver permit, $23.
(i) Emergency driver permit, $23.
(j) Special limited vision condition learner’s permit, $13.
(k) Disability golf cart driver permit, $44.
(L) Hardship driver permit application, [ $50] $75.
(2) In  addition to paying a fee under this section for issuance of a commercial driver license of
any class, when the Department of Transportation  accepts skills test results from a driver compe-
tency tester certified under ORS 807.080, the person shall pay a fee of $40.
(3) Fees for a motorcycle endorsement are as follows:
(a) In addition  to any fee for the endorsed driver license, for an original motorcycle endorsement
added at the time of an original issuance of a driving privilege or  with a renewal or replacement
of an existing driving privilege, [ $46] $60.
(b) For an original motorcycle endorsement added without  an original issuance of a driving
privilege or without a renewal or replacement of an existing driving privilege, [ $49] $60.
(c) A Motorcycle Safety Subaccount fee:
(A) Upon original issuance of a motorcycle endorsement, $38.
(B) Upon renewal of a driver license with a motorcycle endorsement, $28.
(4) Fees for a farm endorsement are as follows:
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 1
(a) In addition to any fee for the endorsed driver license, for an original farm endorsement added
at the time  of an original issuance of a driving privilege or with a renewal or replacement of an
existing driving privilege, $26.
(b) For an original farm endorsement added without an original issuance of a  driving privilege
or without a renewal or replacement of an existing driving privilege, $29.
(5) Fees for renewal of a driving privilege are as follows:
(a) Class C driver license, [ $34] $48.
(b) Class C limited term driver license, $8.
(c) Commercial driver license, [ $55] $98.
(d) Limited term commercial driver license, $14.
(e) Instruction driver permit, [ $23] $26.
(f) Disability golf cart driver permit, $32.
(6) Fee to replace a driver license or driver permit, [ $26] $30.
(7) Fees to take tests required for driving privileges or to remove restrictions are as follows:
(a) The knowledge test for a Class C driver  license or Class C limited term driver license, [ $5]
$7.
(b) The knowledge test for a motorcycle endorsement, [ $5] $7.
(c) The knowledge test for any commercial driver license or commercial learner driver permit,
to remove a commercial driving privilege  restriction or to add a commercial driving privilege
endorsement, $10.
(d) The skills test for a Class C driver license or Class C limited term driver license, [ $9] $45.
(e) The skills test for  any commercial driver license, to remove a restriction or to add any
commercial driver license endorsement, [ $70] $145.
(8) Student Driver Training Fund eligibility fee, $6.
(9) Limited term Student Driver Training Fund eligibility fee, $2.
(10) Fee for reinstatement  of revoked driving privileges under ORS 809.390 or reinstatement of
suspended driving privileges under ORS 809.380, [ $75] $85.
(11) The department may adopt rules to provide for the assessment  or retention of the skills test
fee when a test is scheduled but the applicant fails to appear at the scheduled time.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 807.410 is amended to read:
807.410. (1) The following fees apply to identification cards unless otherwise provided by ORS
807.400 or otherwise provided by law:
(a) For issuance of an original identification card, [ $44.50] $47.
(b) For renewal of an identification card, [ $40.50] $43.
(c) For replacement of an identification card, [ $39.50] $40.
(d) For reinstatement of an identification card after suspension, [ $75] $85.
(e) For issuance of an original limited term identification card, $20.
(f) For renewal of a limited term identification card, $18.
(g) For replacement of a limited term identification card, [ $39.50] $40.
(2) The Department of Transportation may not charge a fee for  issuing, renewing or replacing
a parking identification card.
(3) The department may not charge a fee for issuing or renewing an identification card, or pro-
viding two replacement identification  cards before the expiration of the current identification card,
for an individual who is experiencing homelessness. The individual shall present a form that  indi-
cates the individual qualifies for the fee waiver,  as determined by a nonprofit organization or state
agency that provides services to individuals experiencing homelessness. Before a nonprofit organ-
ization or state agency  issues  documentation under this subsection, the organization or state
agency must first meet the standards established by the department by rule.  The department, by
rule, shall prescribe the form.
(4) As used in this section, “state agency” means an agency of the  executive department,
as defined in ORS 174.112.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 803.215 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 2
803.215. A fee of [ $7] $9 shall be charged for an inspection of  a vehicle required by ORS 803.210.
SECTION 4.  ORS 803.420 is amended to read:
803.420. (1) The vehicle registration fees imposed  under this section shall be based on the clas-
sifications determined by the Department of Transportation by rule. The department may  classify a
vehicle to ensure  that registration fees for the vehicle are the same as for other vehicles the de-
partment determines to be comparable.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, or unless the vehicle is registered quarterly,
the fees described  in this section are for an entire registration period for the vehicle as described
under ORS 803.415. For a vehicle registered for  a quarterly registration period under ORS 803.415,
the department shall apportion any fee under this section to reflect the number  of quarters regis-
tered.
(3) Vehicle registration fees are due when a vehicle  is registered and when the registered owner
renews the registration.
(4) In addition to  the registration fees listed in this section, a county or a district may impose
an additional registration fee as provided under ORS 801.041 and 801.042.
(5) A rental or leasing company, as defined in ORS  221.275, that elects to initially register a
vehicle for an annual or biennial registration period shall pay a fee of $2 in addition  to the vehicle
registration fee provided under this section.
(6) The registration fees for each year of the  registration period for vehicles subject to biennial
registration are as follows:
(a) Passenger vehicles not otherwise provided for in this section or ORS 821.320, $43.
(b) Utility trailers or light trailers, as those terms are defined by rule by the department, $63.
(c) Mopeds and motorcycles, $44.
(d) Low-speed vehicles, $63.
(e) Medium-speed electric vehicles, $63.
(7) The  registration fees for vehicles that are subject to biennial registration and that are listed
in this subsection are as follows:
(a) State-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.045 and undercover vehicles registered under
ORS 805.060, $10 upon registration or renewal.
(b) Fixed load vehicles:
(A) If a declaration of weight described under ORS 803.435 is submitted  establishing the weight
of the vehicle at 3,000 pounds or less, $61.
(B) If no declaration of weight is submitted or if the weight  of the vehicles is in excess of 3,000
pounds, $82.
(c) Travel trailers, special  use trailers, campers and motor homes, based on length as determined
under ORS 803.425:
(A) Trailers or campers that are 6 to 10 feet in length, $81.
(B) Trailers or campers over 10 feet in length, $81 plus [ $6.75] $7 a foot for each foot of  length
over the first 10 feet.
(C) Motor homes that are 6 to 14 feet in length, $86.
(D) Motor homes over 14 feet  in length, $126 plus [ $7.50] $8 a foot for each foot of length over
the first 10 feet.
(8) The registration fee for trailers for  hire that are equipped with pneumatic tires made of an
elastic material and that are not  travel trailers or trailers registered under permanent registration
is $30.
(9) The registration fees for vehicles subject to ownership registration are as follows:
(a) Government-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.040, $5.
(b) Vehicles registered with special registration for disabled veterans under ORS 805.100  or for
former prisoners of war under ORS 805.110, $15.
(c) School vehicles registered under ORS 805.050, $5.
(10) The registration fees for vehicles subject to permanent registration are as follows:
(a) Antique vehicles registered under ORS 805.010, $100.
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 3
(b) Vehicles of special interest registered under ORS 805.020, $100.
(c) Racing activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.035, $100.
(d) Trailers, $10.
(e) State-owned  vehicles registered under ORS 805.045 and undercover vehicles registered under
ORS 805.060, $10.
(11) The registration fee for trailers registered as part of a fleet under an  agreement reached
pursuant to ORS 802.500 is the same fee as the fee for vehicles of  the same type registered under
other provisions of the Oregon Vehicle Code.
(12) The registration fee for vehicles with proportional registration under ORS 826.009,  or pro-
portional fleet registration under ORS 826.011, is the same  fee as the fee for vehicles of the same
type under this section except that the fees shall be fixed  on an apportioned basis as provided under
the agreement established under ORS 826.007.
(13) In addition to any other registration fees charged for  registration of vehicles in fleets under
ORS 805.120, the department may charge the following fees:
(a) Service charge for each vehicle entered into a fleet, $3.
(b) Service charge for each vehicle in the fleet at the time of renewal, $2.
(14)(a) The registration fee  for motor vehicles required to establish a registration weight under
ORS 803.430 or 826.013, tow vehicles used to transport property for hire other than as described in
ORS 822.210 and commercial buses is as provided  in the following chart, based upon the weight
submitted in the declaration of weight prepared under ORS 803.435 or 826.015:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 74
8,001 to 10,000 464
10,001 to 12,000 528
12,001 to 14,000 591
14,001 to 16,000 655
16,001 to 18,000 718
18,001 to 20,000 801
20,001 to 22,000 864
22,001 to 24,000 949
24,001 to 26,000 1,031
26,001 to 28,000 375
28,001 to 30,000 391
30,001 to 32,000 422
32,001 to 34,000 438
34,001 to 36,000 468
36,001 to 38,000 485
38,001 to 40,000 515
40,001 to 42,000 532
42,001 to 44,000 562
44,001 to 46,000 578
46,001 to 48,000 593
48,001 to 50,000 625
50,001 to 52,000 656
52,001 to 54,000 672
54,001 to 56,000 686
56,001 to 58,000 717
58,001 to 60,000 750
60,001 to 62,000 780
62,001 to 64,000 811
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 4
64,001 to 66,000 827
66,001 to 68,000 857
68,001 to 70,000 874
70,001 to 72,000 904
72,001 to 74,000 921
74,001 to 76,000 951
76,001 to 78,000 967
78,001 to 80,000 998
80,001 to 82,000 1,014
82,001 to 84,000 1,045
84,001 to 86,000 1,061
86,001 to 88,000 1,092
88,001 to 90,000 1,108
90,001 to 92,000 1,139
92,001 to 94,000 1,155
94,001 to 96,000 1,185
96,001 to 98,000 1,202
98,001 to 100,000 1,218
100,001 to 102,000 1,249
102,001 to 104,000 1,265
104,001 to 105,500 1,295
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(b)(A) The registration fee for  motor vehicles with a registration weight of more than 8,000
pounds that are described in ORS  825.015, that are operated by a charitable organization as defined
in ORS 825.017 (13), is as provided in the following chart:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,001 to 10,000 $ 71
10,001 to 12,000 85
12,001 to 14,000 92
14,001 to 16,000 107
16,001 to 18,000 114
18,001 to 20,000 128
20,001 to 22,000 135
22,001 to 24,000 149
24,001 to 26,000 156
26,001 to 28,000 170
28,001 to 30,000 178
30,001 to 32,000 192
32,001 to 34,000 199
34,001 to 36,000 213
36,001 to 38,000 220
38,001 to 40,000 234
40,001 to 42,000 241
42,001 to 44,000 256
44,001 to 46,000 263
46,001 to 48,000 270
48,001 to 50,000 284
50,001 to 52,000 298
52,001 to 54,000 305
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 5
54,001 to 56,000 312
56,001 to 58,000 327
58,001 to 60,000 341
60,001 to 62,000 355
62,001 to 64,000 369
64,001 to 66,000 376
66,001 to 68,000 391
68,001 to 70,000 398
70,001 to 72,000 412
72,001 to 74,000 419
74,001 to 76,000 433
76,001 to 78,000 440
78,001 to 80,000 454
80,001 to 82,000 462
82,001 to 84,000 476
84,001 to 86,000 483
86,001 to 88,000 497
88,001 to 90,000 504
90,001 to 92,000 518
92,001 to 94,000 525
94,001 to 96,000 540
96,001 to 98,000 547
98,001 to 100,000 554
100,001 to 102,000 568
102,001 to 104,000 575
104,001 to 105,500 589
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(B) The registration fee for motor vehicles  that are certified under ORS 822.205, unless the
motor vehicles are registered under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or that are  used exclusively
to transport manufactured structures, is as provided in the following chart:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 63
8,001 to 10,000 145
10,001 to 12,000 173
12,001 to 14,000 187
14,001 to 16,000 217
16,001 to 18,000 231
18,001 to 20,000 260
20,001 to 22,000 274
22,001 to 24,000 304
24,001 to 26,000 318
26,001 to 28,000 346
28,001 to 30,000 362
30,001 to 32,000 391
32,001 to 34,000 405
34,001 to 36,000 435
36,001 to 38,000 449
38,001 to 40,000 477
40,001 to 42,000 491
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 6
42,001 to 44,000 521
44,001 to 46,000 535
46,001 to 48,000 550
48,001 to 50,000 578
50,001 to 52,000 608
52,001 to 54,000 622
54,001 to 56,000 636
56,001 to 58,000 665
58,001 to 60,000 694
60,001 to 62,000 723
62,001 to 64,000 753
64,001 to 66,000 767
66,001 to 68,000 795
68,001 to 70,000 809
70,001 to 72,000 839
72,001 to 74,000 853
74,001 to 76,000 882
76,001 to 78,000 896
78,001 to 80,000 926
80,001 to 82,000 940
82,001 to 84,000 968
84,001 to 86,000 983
86,001 to 88,000 1,012
88,001 to 90,000 1,027
90,001 to 92,000 1,055
92,001 to 94,000 1,071
94,001 to 96,000 1,099
96,001 to 98,000 1,113
98,001 to 100,000 1,127
100,001 to 102,000 1,157
102,001 to 104,000 1,172
104,001 to 105,500 1,200
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(C) The owner of a vehicle described  in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph must certify
at the time of initial registration, in a manner determined by the department by  rule, that the motor
vehicle will be used exclusively to transport manufactured structures or  exclusively as described in
ORS 822.210, unless  the motor vehicle is registered under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or as
described in ORS 825.015 or 825.017 (13). Registration of a  vehicle described in subparagraph (A)
or (B) of this paragraph is invalid if the vehicle is operated  in any manner other than that described
in the certification under this subparagraph.
(c) Subject to paragraph (d) of  this subsection, the registration fee for motor vehicles registered
as farm vehicles under ORS 805.300 is as provided in the following chart, based upon the registra-
tion weight given in the declaration of weight submitted under ORS 803.435:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 50
8,001 to 10,000 65
10,001 to 12,000 75
12,001 to 14,000 97
14,001 to 16,000 108
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 7
16,001 to 18,000 129
18,001 to 20,000 141
20,001 to 22,000 162
22,001 to 24,000 172
24,001 to 26,000 195
26,001 to 28,000 204
28,001 to 30,000 226
30,001 to 32,000 237
32,001 to 34,000 258
34,001 to 36,000 270
36,001 to 38,000 291
38,001 to 40,000 302
40,001 to 42,000 324
42,001 to 44,000 334
44,001 to 46,000 356
46,001 to 48,000 366
48,001 to 50,000 388
50,001 to 52,000 399
52,001 to 54,000 409
54,001 to 56,000 432
56,001 to 58,000 453
58,001 to 60,000 463
60,001 to 62,000 474
62,001 to 64,000 496
64,001 to 66,000 517
66,001 to 68,000 528
68,001 to 70,000 540
70,001 to 72,000 561
72,001 to 74,000 571
74,001 to 76,000 594
76,001 to 78,000 604
78,001 to 80,000 625
80,001 to 82,000 636
82,001 to 84,000 657
84,001 to 86,000 669
86,001 to 88,000 690
88,001 to 90,000 700
90,001 to 92,000 723
92,001 to 94,000 733
94,001 to 96,000 754
96,001 to 98,000 765
98,001 to 100,000 787
100,001 to 102,000 798
102,001 to 104,000 819
104,001 to 105,500 831
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(d) For  any vehicle that is registered under a quarterly registration period, the registration fee
is a minimum of $15 for each quarter registered plus an additional fee of $2.
(15) The registration and renewal  fees for vehicles specified in this subsection that are required
to establish a registration weight under ORS 803.430 or 826.013 are as follows:
(a) State-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.045, $10.
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 8
(b) Undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060, $10.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 803.570 is amended to read:
803.570. Except as otherwise specifically provided  by law, the Department of Transportation
shall collect the fee described by this section each time the department issues a registration  plate
upon the registration of a vehicle or at other times  when a registration plate is issued by the de-
partment. The following all apply to the fee established by this section:
(1) The fee shall be in addition to any other fee collected upon issuance of a registration  plate.
(2) The fee for each registration plate issued and for each pair of plates issued  shall be deter-
mined by the department and shall be established  by the department by rule. The department shall
establish fees for a single plate and for a pair of plates under this section by:
(a) Determining the cost of manufacturing a single plate or a pair of plates and rounding the
cost to the next higher [ half-dollar] dollar; and
(b) Adding $10 for a single plate and $20 for a pair of plates.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 803.575 is amended to read:
803.575. (1) The fee for issuance  of a duplicate or replacement registration card under ORS
803.510 is $5.
(2) The fee for issuance of a  replacement or duplicate registration plate under ORS 803.530 is
the fee established under ORS 803.570, together with a fee of  $12 [$5 if the plate is issued at the  time
of renewal of registration or a fee of $10 if the plate is issued at any other time ].
(3) The fee for transfer of registration plate under ORS 803.530 is [ $6] $30.
(4) The fee for issuance of replacement registration stickers under ORS 803.555 is $10.
(5) The fee for issuance of both replacement or duplicate  registration plates and replacement
registration stickers, when issued at the same  time, is the fee established under ORS 803.570, to-
gether with a fee of $12 [ $5 if the  plate and stickers are issued at the time of renewal of registration
or a fee of $10 if the plate and stickers are issued at any other time ].
(6) A fee paid under subsection (2), (4) or (5) of this section includes the cost of  any duplicate
or replacement registration card issued.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 805.250 is amended to read:
805.250. This section establishes fees for issuance of registration plates authorized under  ORS
805.200. If a fee for plates authorized in ORS 805.200 is not established in this section, the fee is  the
same fee as established under ORS 803.570. Where a fee is established under this section,  the fee
is in addition to the fee established under ORS 803.570 unless otherwise provided in the following:
(1) Amateur radio operator registration plates issued under ORS 805.230, $5.
(2) Customized registration plates issued under ORS 805.240:
(a) For original issuance or renewal, $50 annual fee.
(b) For issuance of a duplicate or replacement plate,  $12 [ $5 when the plate  is issued at the time
of renewal of registration or $10 when the plate is issued at any other time ].
(3) Special interest registration plates approved under ORS 805.210 are approved  without cost
except as provided in this subsection, including without payment of the fee established under  ORS
803.570. If identifying stickers are required, $1 per sticker or pair of stickers.
(4) Dealer plates issued under ORS 822.020 and 822.040 are as follows:
(a) For the original dealer plate, no fee except the fee established under ORS 803.570.
(b) For replacement dealer  plates, $10 for each plate except that persons dealing exclusively in
motorcycles, mopeds, snowmobiles or any combination of those vehicles shall pay only $3  for each
replacement plate.
(c) For additional plates, or for renewal of registration, $42,  except that persons dealing exclu-
sively in motorcycles, mopeds or snowmobiles or any  combination of those vehicles shall pay only
$9 for each additional plate, or for renewal of registration.
(5) Special vehicle  transporter plates or devices issued under ORS 822.310, $5 for each plate or
device.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 803.415 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 9
803.415. This section  establishes registration periods for vehicles. The registration periods are
periods described under ORS 803.400.  Except as provided in the following, the registration period
for any  vehicle registered in this state by the Department of Transportation is a biennial registra-
tion period:
(1) The following vehicles have permanent registration:
(a) Antique vehicles registered under ORS 805.010.
(b) Vehicles of special interest registered under ORS 805.020.
(c) Trailers  that will be operated on the highways at a loaded weight of more than 8,000 pounds
and are not travel trailers, fixed load vehicles or special use trailers.
(2) Government-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.040 have ownership registration.
(3) The following vehicles may  be registered under annual or quarterly registration unless the
vehicles are registered under proportional registration under ORS 826.009 or proportional fleet
registration under ORS 826.011:
(a) Vehicles required to establish a registration weight under ORS 803.430.
(b) Commercial buses.
(c) Vehicles registered as farm vehicles under ORS 805.300.
(4) Snowmobiles are registered as provided in ORS 821.080.
(5) Vehicles operated by dealers who hold  certificates under ORS 822.020 are as provided under
ORS 822.040.
(6) Trailers for hire that will be operated at a loaded weight of  8,000 pounds or less may be
registered as follows:
(a) Annual registration; or
(b) If registered under an agreement pursuant to ORS 802.500, for a period of  time determined
as specified in the agreement or as determined by the department.
(7) Except as otherwise  provided in subsection (10) of this section, the registration period for
electric vehicles and hybrid  vehicles that use electricity and another source of motive power is a
biennial registration period except that  the registration period for the following electric or hybrid
vehicles is an annual registration period:
(a) Commercial buses.
(b) Electric or hybrid vehicles registered as farm vehicles under ORS 805.300.
(c) Vehicles required to establish registration weight under ORS 803.430.
(8) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.100 have an ownership registration period.
(9) School vehicles registered under ORS  805.050 have ownership registration except that the
registration shall continue to be valid if ownership of the vehicle  is transferred to a person who
continues to use the vehicle for purposes authorized by ORS 805.050.
(10) The following vehicles have a four-year registration period:
(a) New vehicles registered under ORS 803.420 (6)(a) for which  new registration plates will be
issued; and
[(b) New mopeds or motorcycles registered under ORS 803.420 (6)(c) for  which new registration
plates will be issued; and ]
[(c)] (b) New trailers registered under ORS 803.420 (6)(b), for  which new registration plates will
be issued.
(11) A rental or leasing company, as defined in ORS 221.275, may  elect an annual, a biennial or
a four-year registration period for the initial registration of a new vehicle registered  under ORS
803.420 (6)(a) for  which new registration plates will be issued if the company owns the vehicle that
is being registered. The subsequent renewal or reregistration periods for the vehicle are biennial.
(12) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.110 have ownership registration except that the  regis-
tration shall continue  to be valid if ownership of the vehicle is transferred to a spouse who is au-
thorized to retain the former prisoner of war registration plates under ORS 805.110.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 822.043 is amended to read:
822.043. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Integrator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 802.600.
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 10
(b) “Vehicle dealer” means a person issued a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020.
(2) A vehicle dealer that the Department of Transportation has designated to act  as an agent
of the department  under ORS 802.031 may elect to prepare, submit, or prepare and submit documents
necessary to:
(a) Issue or transfer a certificate of title for a vehicle;
(b) Register a vehicle or transfer registration of a vehicle;
(c) Issue a registration plate;
(d) Verify and clear a title;
(e) Perfect, release or satisfy a lien or other security interest;
(f) Comply with federal security requirements; or
(g) Render any other services for  the purpose of complying with state and federal laws related
to the sale of a vehicle.
(3) A vehicle dealer who prepares any documents described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) May charge a purchaser of a vehicle a document  processing fee for the preparation of those
documents.
(b) May not charge  a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee for the submission of
any document or the issuance of a registration plate.
(c) May charge  a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee for performing any of the
services described in subsection (2) of this section in connection with preparing the documents  de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A purchaser of a vehicle may negotiate  the amount of the document processing fee with a
vehicle dealer, but in no case shall  the document processing fee charged by a vehicle dealer under
this section exceed:
(a) [ $150] $250, if the vehicle dealer uses an integrator; or
(b) [ $115] $200, if the vehicle dealer does not use an integrator.
(5) If a vehicle dealer charges a document processing  fee under subsection (4)(a) of this section,
of the amount collected [ $25] $35 shall be paid to the integrator.
(6) Unless otherwise provided by rule,  if a vehicle dealer uses an integrator and charges a
document processing fee greater than that charged for not using  an integrator, the dealer must in-
form the purchaser of the vehicle of the option  of using an integrator to prepare the documents. The
purchaser may then elect whether or not to have the vehicle dealer use an integrator to prepare
the documents.
(7) If the purchaser of a  vehicle pays a document processing fee, the vehicle dealer shall prepare
and submit all documents to complete the transaction as permitted by law.
(8)(a) A vehicle dealer who collects the privilege tax imposed  under ORS 320.405 from the pur-
chaser of a taxable motor vehicle may collect  the privilege tax at the same time and in the same
manner as the vehicle dealer collects document processing fees under  this section. The amount of
the privilege tax shall be in addition to and not in  lieu of document processing fees collected under
this section.
(b) A vehicle dealer may exclude the  amount of the privilege tax from the capitalized cost and
offering price of a taxable motor vehicle as those terms are defined  by the Department of Justice
by rule.
SECTION 10.
(1) The amendments to ORS 803.215,  803.420, 803.570, 803.575, 805.250, 807.370
and 807.410 by sections 1 to  7 of this 2023 Act apply to amounts imposed on or after the ef-
fective date of this 2023 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 803.415 by  section 8 of this 2023 Act apply to new mopeds
or motorcycles registered on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 11. The amendments to ORS 822.043 by section 9 of this 2023 Act apply to  fees
imposed on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 11
Passed by House June 8, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-A) Page 12